Mississippi, session 2026, HB454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Period of Quiet Reflection Act." SECTION 2.  Section 37-13-8, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-8.  (1)  In each public school classroom, the local school governing board * * * may authorize shall require a brief period of quiet reflection for not more than sixty (60) seconds at the opening of school upon every school day. (2)  The moment of quiet reflection * * * authorized required by subsection (1) of this section is not intended to be and shall not be conducted as a religious service or exercise but is considered an opportunity for a moment of silent reflection. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.